Vermont statutes. TITLE 10A Vermont Fish and Wildlife Regulations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions
§ 15.
Rule governing public use of Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department Lands.

Authority.

This rule is adopted pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4145(a)
which authorizes the Board to adopt rules to “regulate the use by the public of access areas, landing areas, parking areas or of other lands or waters acquired or maintained pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4144
.”

Purpose.

The purposes of this rule is to regulate public activities and use at Wildlife Management Areas, Riparian Lands, Conservation Camps and Fish Culture Stations in order to protect, manage, and conserve the fish, wildlife, vegetation and other natural and
cultural resources of the State, to provide for the safe and efficient operation of the developed facilities of the Department and to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public.

To foster quality hunting, fishing, trapping and other fish-based and wildlife-based activities at these lands and facilities.

This rule does not apply to Fishing Access Areas governed by 10 V.S.A. § 4145.

This rule is not intended to interfere with deed restrictions, easements, rights-of-way or other applicable legal agreements.

Definitions.

“Board” means the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Board as defined in

10 V.S.A. § 4041
.

“Department” means Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department.

“Commissioner” means Commissioner of the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department.

“Wildlife Management Area” or “WMA” means any lands or portions of lands of the Department so designated by the Department.

“Riparian Land” means any lands or portions of lands of the Department other than WMAs, Fish Culture Stations, Fishing Access Areas and Conservation Camps so designated by the Department, such as but not limited to stream bank parcels, dams, and pond
sites.

“Conservation Camp” means any facilities, lands or portions of lands of the Department so designated by the Department.

“Fish Culture Station” means any facilities, lands or portions of lands of the Department so designated by the Department.

“Designated Site” means a delineated area at a WMA, Riparian Land, Conservation Camp or Fish Culture Station that the Department has designated for a particular activity or prohibition on an activity, and so identified and demarcated with signage or identified
on a Department-issued map.

“Designated Corridor” means a road, trail, path or other linear travel route at a WMA, Riparian Land, Conservation Camp or Fish Culture Station that the Department has designated for travel by a particular means or vehicle, and so identified with signage
or identified on a Department-issued map.

“Authorized Activity” means an activity for which a person does not need prior permission to engage in, and can engage in at a WMA, Riparian Land, Conservation Camp or Fish Culture Station, or at a Designated Site or on a Designated Corridor within a
WMA, Riparian Land, Conservation Camp or Fish Culture Station.

“Prohibited Activity” means an activity that no person, group, business or entity shall be allowed to engage in under any circumstances, and for which no Permit, License or Lease shall be authorized, except as provided for in Sections 6.0 of this regulation.

“Commercial Activity” means any activity or service that produces income for any person, group, business or entity, including any activity or service by any non-profit entity where a fee is required or requested.

“Special Use Permit” means a written authorization issued by the Department or its designee issued to a person, group, business or entity to undertake an activity.

“Group” means ten (10) or more persons.

“Primitive Camping” means temporary overnight occupancy in a natural environment with no developed facilities leaving the site in its original condition so there is no or minimal evidence of human visitation.

“Self-contained Camping” means camping with a portable shelter equipped with a self-contained, portable, sanitary toilet.

“Artifact” means an object produced or shaped by human craft, especially a tool, weapon, or ornament of archaeological or historical interest.

“Emergency situation” means an unintended or unforeseen situation that poses a risk to health or life of a person or animal.

“Field processing” means the gutting or dressing or other removal of non-consumptive parts of an animal for the preservation of the carcass to include the boning and quartering.

“Tree stand” means a platform or structure (placed for any period of time) which is fastened to a tree by nails, bolts, wire, or other fasteners that intrude through the bark into the wood of the tree, or around the tree.

“Ground blind” means a structure or manufactured enclosure made of natural or man-made materials placed on the ground to assist in concealing or disguising the user or occupant. This does not apply to blinds constructed for purposes of hunting waterfowl
which are governed by 10 V.S.A. App. § 23.

“Bait” means any animal, vegetable, fruit or mineral matter placed with the intention of attracting wildlife.

“All-terrain vehicle” or “ATV” means any non-highway recreational vehicle, except snowmobiles, having no less than two low pressure tires (10 pounds per square inch, or less) or tracks, not wider than 60 inches with two-wheel ATVs having permanent, full-time
power to both wheels, and having a dry weight of less than 1,700 pounds, when used for cross-country travel on trails or on any one of the following or a combination thereof: land, water, snow, ice, marsh, swampland, and natural
terrain.

“Utility task vehicle” means a side-by-side four-wheel drive off-road vehicle that has four wheels, or tracks, and is propelled by an internal combustion engine with a piston displacement capacity of 1,200 cubic centimeters or less, and has a total dry
weight of 1,200 to 2,600 pounds.

“Waterbody” means any lake, pond, river, or stream.

Authorized Activities.

The following activities are authorized on all lands under this rule:

Hunting, fishing, trapping and target shooting at designated shooting ranges, as well as all other activities authorized under 10 V.S.A. Part 4;

Fish and wildlife viewing and photography;

Boating, including launching and landing, for fish-based and wildlife-based activities where not otherwise prohibited by any other relevant regulations or statutes;

Dispersed, wildlife-based pedestrian activities including walking, snowshoeing, swimming, cross-country skiing, and collection of shed antlers;

Non-commercial picking of berries, nuts, fungi and other wild edibles except ginseng;

Camping for purposes of hunting, fishing or trapping:

Primitive camping on WMAs designated by the Department for no more than 3 consecutive nights. Camp sites must be at least 200 feet from any waterbody, property line, or road;

Self-contained camping on sites designated by the Department for this purpose, for no more than 16 days during the periods of May 1-31, September 1 through December 15. No individual parcel will have more than three designated sites for self-contained
camping unless that site’s use has been demonstrated to have preceded January 1, 2007.

Fish-based and wildlife-based commercial activities limited to those specified in 4.1(a) — 4.1(c) of this subsection when conducted by a person. This shall include guiding for purposes of fishing, hunting and trapping.

Prohibition on Otherwise Authorized Activities.

The Department may prohibit otherwise Authorized Activities for purposes such as, but not limited to: animal and/or habitat management, plant protection, habitat restoration or public safety.

Prohibited Activities.

The following activities are strictly prohibited, unless otherwise authorized in accordance with Section 6:

The operation of any ATV, UTV, or any wheeled or tracked motorized vehicle not registered for public highway use, except as provided for under this subsection and section 6.0 of this regulation;

Pursuant to

23 V.S.A. § 3506
(b)(4), ATV use is prohibited on, “any public land, body of public water . . . unless the Secretary has designated the area for ATV use by all-terrain vehicles pursuant to rules promulgated under
provisions of 3 V.S.A. chapter 25.”

If the Secretary has previously designated an area of state land for use by ATVs pursuant to

23 V.S.A. § 3506
(b)(4), the Commissioner shall authorize a designated corridor on Department lands for ATV use under section 6.0 of this rule subject to the terms and conditions the Commissioner deems appropriate.

Use of motorized vehicles except on roads specifically designated for such use;

Snowmobiling except as approved by the Department and on designated corridors;

Horseback riding, dog sledding, non-motorized cycle riding, or use of motorized vehicles except on designated corridors;

Draft and pack animals, except for retrieval of legally harvested moose, deer and black bear during the respective hunting season(s);

Commercial Activities except those allowed under 4.1(a-c);

Artifact or fossil collection;

Fires except in emergency situations, or for non-primitive and primitive camping in accordance with 4.1(f);

Abandoning, or disposing of any animal carcass, or their parts, except that portions of fish or game legally harvested on the property may be deposited on site during routine field processing for preservation and transport, or parts used in conjunction
with legal trapping;

Construction or placement of temporary or permanent structures, except as provided under Section 7 of this rule or for primitive and non-primitive camping in accordance with Section 4.1(f);

Collection of plants, trees, evergreen brush or limbs, except wild edibles as allowed under Section 4.1(e) of this rule;

Use of any fireworks or pyrotechnic devices except signal flares in an emergency situation;

Feeding or baiting of wildlife except if otherwise authorized by law;

Taking of fish from a fish culture station except during special events established by the Department, including but not limited to fishing derbies, clinics and educational events;

Entering within 500 feet of any building or other associated infrastructure that is associated with a Department Fish Culture Station or Conservation Camp during times of the day other than those times posted for public use;

Parking of vehicles except while engaged in an Authorized Activity;

All other activities not specifically authorized by this rule, or authorized in writing by the Commissioner including, but not limited to: para-sailing, hang-gliding, recreational rock climbing, and geocaching.

Special Use Activities and Designated Sites on Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department Lands.

The Commissioner may grant a Special Use Permit, Lease or License for any activity under this rule so long as the Commissioner has determined that there will be no adverse impact on Authorized Activities or other adverse impacts on the primary purposes
of ownership.

The Commissioner may designate a site, by means of signage, or being identified on a Department-issued map, for any activity under this rule so long as the Commissioner has determined that there will be no adverse impact on Authorized Activities or other
adverse impacts on the primary purposes of ownership.

The Commissioner may permit accommodations to persons with a qualified disability pursuant to the Americans with Disabilities Act.

Use of Tree Stands and Ground Blinds on WMAs.

Permanent tree stands and ground blinds are prohibited on state-owned WMAs.

Temporary tree stands and ground blinds are permitted on state-owned WMAs under the following conditions:

Tree stands and ground blinds may be erected and used without written permission from the Department during the time period from the third Sunday in August through the third Saturday in December annually, May 1 through May 31, all dates inclusive, or
during any Youth Hunting Day or Weekend. This does not include blinds constructed for purposes of hunting waterfowl pursuant to 10 V.S.A. App. § 23.

Tree stands and ground blinds may be erected and used at other times of the year with advance notice to, and written permission from, the Department’s District office staff responsible for managing and administering state land in the District in which
the land is located.

Tree stands and ground blinds used on WMAs must be constructed and erected in such a way that:

No damage is done to any living tree in erecting, maintaining, using, or accessing the stand or blind except that:

Dead limbs, trees or shrubs may be removed as needed to erect and use the stand or blind, and;

No live limbs, trees or shrubs may be cut for any purpose except those one inch or less in diameter at either ground level or from the main stem or branch of the tree where the stand or blind is located as appropriate (for guidance, a U.S. quarter is
.9 inch in diameter), and;

No nails, bolts, screws (including access steps), wire, chain or other material that penetrates through the bark and into the wood of live trees shall be used in erecting any stand or blind.

All tree stands or ground blinds used on WMAs must be clearly and legibly marked with the owner’s name and address. Marking shall be legible and placed in a manner that enables a person to conveniently and easily read it.

Tree stands and ground blinds that do not conform to this regulation are prohibited and may be confiscated and/or destroyed by the Department. Building, erecting, maintaining, using or occupying a non-conforming tree stand or ground blind is prohibited.
Construction of any tree stand or ground blind does not confer exclusive use of its location to the person who built it. Any person may use that location for purposes consistent with this rule.

HISTORY:
Added 1998, Fish and Wildlife Commissioner’s Reg. No. 1024, eff. Sept. 8, 1998; 2013, Fish and Wildlife Commissioner’s Reg. eff. Dec. 28, 2012.

§ 15a.
Fees for the Use of Fish and Wildlife Department Lands and Facilities.

Authority.

This rule is adopted pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4132(e)
that requires the Commissioner of the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department to adopt and publish regulations for reasonable fees for the use of Department lands.

In accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4132(e)
, all fees or charges collected for the use of fish and wildlife lands and properties shall be deposited in the Fish and Wildlife Fund.

Purpose.

In accordance

10 V.S.A. § 4132(e)
, this rule is designed to set fees for the use of Vermont of Fish and Wildlife Department lands, roads, buildings, other property including Wildlife Management Areas, Fishing Access Areas, and other Department lands
and sets tuition for the Green Mountain Conservation Camps.

The activities for which fees shall be charged under this rule shall be consistent with the Rule Governing Public Use of Fish and Wildlife Department Lands.

Definitions.

“Partnering organizations” means any government entity or non-governmental organization with whom the Department has a memorialized partnership and whose purposes, and proposed activity, are consistent with the mission of the Vermont Fish and Wildlife
Department.

“Private entity” means a person or group whose proposed activity is unaffiliated with the mission of the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department.

“License” a written instrument that authorizes a certain activity on Department property but does not vest the licensee with any property rights.

“Special Use Permit” means a formal written authorization for short-term, low impact use by individuals or groups.

“Department” means the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department.

“Edward F. Kehoe Education Center” means the main floor of the Educational Center and surrounding buildings, lawns.

“Buck Lake Conservation Camp” means the dining hall, restrooms, tent erection areas and Wightman building.

Fees.

Edward F. Kehoe Education Center

Partnering Organizations and Municipalities

Click to view

Waivers.

Department Employees working in their official capacity, and participants of Department sponsored events, are exempt from fees subject to the approval of the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee.

Partnering organizations paying fees for an activity under 4.1 of this rule shall be waived of any additional fees for use of Department lands associated with that activity.

Day Use (per day/all facilities $175 Conference Room $30/day; $20// day 1 2 Damage Deposit (refundable if all $150 day/use requirements are met) Cabin Rental (Includes 4 people $60 / night $5 per additional person) School Groups (K-12) Day Use $5/per
student (b) Private Entity Grounds - Day Use (Weekend) $750 Grounds - Day Use (Weekday) $500 Conference Room (single) $200 Conference Room (double) $350 Weddings $3,000 4.2 Buck Lake Conservation Camp Facility Day Use (per day) $175
Damage Deposit (refundable if all $150 /day use requirements met) Dining Hall Only $50 day; $25// day 1 2 Cabin Rentals (rate is for 4 people; $60/night $5.00 per additional persons) 4.3 Conservation Camp Tuition $250 4.4 Controlled
Waterfowl Hunt $10 /person Dead Creek WMA and Mud Creek WMA 4.5 Meeting Rooms - Grand Isle Fish $25 /day Culture Station, Gorden Center Training Facility Overnight Accommodations - $25/person/night Gordon Center Training Facility 4.6
Special Use Permit $50 Minimum - $10,000 Maximum 4.7 License $50 Minimum $10,000 Maximum

HISTORY:
Added 2013, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. eff. July 1, 2013.

§ 15b.
Rule Governing Public Use of Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department Shooting Ranges.

Authority.

This rule is adopted pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4146
which authorizes the Commissioner to adopt rules “as necessary for the proper protection and management” of public shooting grounds.

This rule is only applicable to shooting range facilities which are owned by the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department and are open to the general public.

Purpose.

The purposes of this rule are to regulate public activities and use at Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department shooting ranges, to provide for the safe and efficient operation of these facilities and to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public.

Requirements and Prohibited Activities at all Department Shooting Ranges.

All range users shall:

have a valid Vermont hunting, fishing or combination license as required for individuals 15 years of age and older, unless attending an event or training sponsored by the Department;

be limited to one unlicensed visitor and shall be held accountable for the visitor. All visitors shall be required to purchase his or her own license after 3 visits during the range year (April 1st — Dec 14th).

wear hearing and eye protection, this includes both shooters and spectators;

not handle or shoot any firearms while anyone is beyond or in front of the firing line, shooting benches or otherwise down range;

communicate to all shooters to cease shooting, before going down range;

point any firearm in a safe direction at all times;

cap and prime muzzleloaders from the firing line;

keep all firearms unloaded, with actions open, until the shooter is ready to fire at the firing line; and

remove and place all discarded objects, trash, targets and spent cartridge hulls in trash receptacles before leaving the range.

The following activities are strictly prohibited:

The use of the shooting range at any other time than the range hours posted at the range by the Commissioner of the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department.

The use of tracer, armor piercing or steel core ammunition.

The shooting of any airborne or thrown objects (e.g. clay pigeons), unless designated for such purpose.

Shooting long rifles and shotguns from any pistol bench.

Shooting handguns from the long-gun benches.

Shooting outside the designated shooting areas, in front of the firing line or, anywhere other than from or right next to shooting benches.

Shooting any target other than paper targets secured to the target frames and raised above ground level, unless attending an event or training sponsored by the Department. No other targets shall be allowed.

Shooting at the vegetation, trash, range equipment or facilities.

Shooting from the hip or any other shooting position in which the shooter cannot properly utilize the sights.

The use of lighted tobacco products such as cigarettes, cigars, and pipes; and the use of alcohol, or any illegal substances.

The presence at the facility or use of the facility by any person who is under the influence of alcohol or any illegal substances.

Children (aged 15 years or younger) that are not accompanied by an individual over the age of 18, unless attending an event or training sponsored by the Department.

The presence of any domestic animal or pets on the range except bona fide Service and Assistance Animals.

The use of any fireworks, pyrotechnics, or any other explosive targets, including tannerite.

Hours of Operation and Prohibited Activities Applicable Only to Hammonds Cove Shooting Range.

Unless otherwise posted at the discretion of the Commissioner of the Fish and Wildlife Department, the Hammond Cove Shooting Range shall be open: April 1 to December 14, Thursday through Monday, 10AM to 3PM; except Sundays, 10AM to 2PM.

Hammonds Cove Shooting Range shall be closed December 15 through March 31; and on all Vermont State & Federal Holidays; except for special events approved by the Commissioner.

Firing more than one round per second is prohibited at Hammonds Cove Shooting Range.

HISTORY:
Added 2015, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. eff. July 1, 2016.

§ 16.
Suspension of licenses: Enforcement of child support orders, 15 V.S.A. § 798.

For the purposes of this rule the term “license” shall include any and all licenses and permits issued by the Vermont Fish & Wildlife Department.

Upon receipt of a license suspension order issued by the court pursuant to

15 V.S.A. § 798
, a suspension notice shall be issued to the license holder. The license holder shall have 15 days to contest the suspension based on the grounds of mistaken identity or compliance with the support order. If the
suspension is not contested, the suspension will be effective on the 16th day as provided in the notice and the license shall be forwarded to the Law Enforcement Division of the Fish & Wildlife Department, 103 South Main Street,
Waterbury, VT.

All notices of compliance with a child support order shall be upon a standard compliance form, as devised and approved by the court, the Vermont Agency of Human Services, Department of Children and Families, and this Department.

If the motion for the court order was brought by the Vermont Agency of Human Services, Department of Children and Families, then notice of compliance shall only be accepted from the Vermont Agency of Human Services, Department of Children and Families
or the court.

If the motion for the court order was brought by the custodial parent, then notice of compliance shall be accepted from the custodial parent, custodial parent’s attorney, or the court.

If the notice of compliance was dated before the effective date of the suspension, the suspension shall be canceled.

Upon notice of reinstatement from the court, the Department shall reissue the suspended license and notify the individual of such within five (5) working days of the receipt of the notice. The Department shall charge a reinstatement fee equal to the cost
of the original license.

Department personnel shall direct all inquiries from persons seeking reinstatement to the court or the Vermont Agency of Human Services, Department of Children and Families, if Vermont Agency of Human Services, Department of Children and Families was
the entity which brought the motion for suspension before this court.

This rule is promulgated pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4081
. In promulgating this rule, the Fish and Wildlife Board is following the policy established by the General Assembly that the protection, propagation, control, management, and conservation of fish, wildlife and
furbearing animals in this State is in the interest of the public welfare and that the safeguarding of this valuable resource for the people of the State requires a constant and continual vigilance.

In accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4082
, this rule is designed to maintain the best health, population and utilization levels of the regulated species and other necessary or desirable species which are related to the regulated species.

This rule applies to importation and possession of deer or elk carcasses or the parts thereof, from chronic wasting disease endemic areas and captive hunt or farm facilities.

This rule shall apply to all persons who import, possess, transport, use, or deal with deer or elk carcasses, or parts thereof, from chronic wasting disease endemic areas and captive hunt or farm facilities.

The purpose of this rule is to:

ensure the conservation of the wildlife in the State, and

maintain the best health of native cervidae of the State, and

prevent the introduction or spread of a disease that is potentially harmful to humans and wild species.

Permitted Activities and Restrictions

The importation or possession of deer or elk carcasses, or the parts thereof, from chronic wasting disease endemic areas and captive hunt or farm facilities is prohibited except as provided below:

Meat that is cut up and packaged, and not mixed with other deer or elk during processing.

Meat that is boneless.

Hides or cape with no part of the head attached.

Clean skull-cap with antlers attached.

Antlers with no other meat or tissue attached.

Finished taxidermy heads.

Upper canine teeth with no tissue attached.

All hunters shall identify their deer and elk with their non-resident license information in accordance with section 2a of this title.

Chronic Wasting Disease Endemic Areas

The Department shall provide a list of chronic wasting disease endemic areas and shall update the list as areas are added or deleted. The list shall be available on the Department’s web site, from the Department’s headquarters and from the Department’s
district offices. The list shall also be made available to the media as much as practicably possible to provide maximum notice to the public.

Captive Hunting or Farm Facilities Defined.

Captive Hunting Facilities are any facilities with captive deer or elk held in a fenced or walled enclosure for the purpose of taking by hunting.

Farm Facilities are any facilities with captive deer or elk held in a fenced or walled enclosure and are raised for meat, hides, antlers or other products.

HISTORY:
Added 1998, Fish and Wildlife Commissioner’s Reg. No. 1026, eff. Dec. 19, 1998.

§ 17.
Rule governing the importation and possession of deer or elk from chronic wasting disease endemic areas and captive hunt or farm facilities.

HISTORY:
Added 2003, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1100, eff. June 4, 2003.

§ 18.
Governing the importation and possession of wild animals, excluding fish.

Authority.

This rule is adopted pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4081(a)
and (b) which authorizes the Board to carry out the purposes of protecting the State’s wildlife, and

10 V.S.A. § 4709
which regulates the importation and possession of wild birds and animals in the State and establishes a permit application fee, and

10 V.S.A. § 4152
establishes scientific and education collection permits.

Purpose.

It is the purpose of this regulation to carry out the mandate of the Vermont General Assembly to control through a permit program the importation and possession of wild animals in Vermont as provided in

10 V.S.A. § 4709
. It is the purpose of this statute and its regulations to protect the health, safety and welfare of animals, both wild and domestic, to prevent damage to agriculture and livestock, and to protect the health, safety
and welfare of human inhabitants of the State of Vermont.

Definitions.

(Wild Animals or Wildlife) — All animals, including mammals, birds, amphibians and reptiles, excluding fish and those animals defined by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets by rule as pets and those defined as domestic under paragraph 3.2 of
this rule. Included in this definition is any part, product, egg, offspring, dead body, or part of the dead body of any such wildlife. Wildlife includes all subspecies of wildlife and any other group of wildlife of the same species,
the members of which may interbreed when mature, including any hybrid species except wolf-hybrids. Wild animals taken or possessed, or reared in captivity remain wild animals and are not domestic or tame animals.

(Domestic Birds and Animals) — The Department shall provide a list of domestic animals and shall update the list as needed, adding or deleting animals as necessary. The list shall be available on the Department’s web site, from the Department’s headquarters
and from the Department’s district offices. The list shall also be made available to the media as much as practicably possible to provide maximum notice to the public.

(Board) — Vermont Fish and Wildlife Board

(Department) — Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department

(Commercial) — To sell, have sold, or offer for sale as defined in

10 V.S.A. § 4001(22)
; barter, exchange and offering or exposing for sale; and possession with the intent to sell, import, or export.

(Commissioner) — Fish and Wildlife Department Commissioner as defined in

10 V.S.A. § 4001(27)
.

(Dealer) — Any person, who commercially buys or sells any wild animal, as defined in 3.5.

(Unrestricted Wild Animals) — Those species determined not to conflict with the purposes of this regulation.

(Native Wildlife) — Native to the State of Vermont, either historically or at present.

Importation or possession of wild animals.

Except as otherwise provided by law, it is unlawful for any person to bring into or possess in the State of Vermont any live wild animal, or live ovum or semen thereof, of any kind, unless upon application in writing, the person obtains from the Commissioner
a permit to do so; or the species of animal, ovum, or semen is listed as a domestic bird or animal, domestic pet, or unrestricted wild animal.

The importation and possession of dead wild animals, in accordance with all laws and regulations applicable in Vermont or the place of origin, for personal use are exempt from this regulation.

The importation, possession and regulation of pests and beneficial organisms regulated by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets is exempt from this regulation.

Permits.

Dealer’s Permit.

All commercial dealers in Vermont, including, but not limited to pet shop owners, persons raising frogs for sale as institutional experimental animals, and all persons who import, export, and/or sell wild birds and animals must first obtain a valid Dealer’s
Permit from the Department.

Except as provided herein, the Commissioner shall not issue a permit for the keeping or possession of any wild animal in captivity, except for bona fide scientific or educational purposes as permitted by (

10 V.S.A. § 4152
).

For purposes other than importation and possession for bona fide research and educational purposes, the Commissioner shall not issue a permit unless it has been determined that the wild animal or wildlife proposed to be brought into or possessed in the
State does not conflict with the purpose of this regulation. The Commissioner shall establish a list of Unrestricted Wild Animals that do not conflict with the purpose of this regulation, are commonly sold in the pet trade,
and do not require an Importation and Possession Permit from the Department.

The Unrestricted Wild Animals List will consist of those species that are determined to be no threat to the State’s native wildlife, minimal threat to human health and safety, and suitable as pets for the residents of the State. This list is expected
to be revised periodically by the Commissioner depending on recent pet trade trends, disease, and health issues. The list shall be posted on the Department website and made available at the Department’s central and district
offices.

In accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4152
, the Commissioner may issue permits to collect birds, their nests and eggs and wild animals, or their parts thereof, for public scientific research, educational purposes, art, or photography.

Any person who collects any wild animal within the boundaries of the State of Vermont and sells said wild animal must obtain a Commercial Collection Permit from the Department.

Any person importing or possessing any wild animal for the purposes of temporary exhibition must obtain from the Commissioner a permit to do so; unless the species is listed as a domestic bird or animal, domestic pet, or unrestricted wild animal.

Any person breeding and propagating wild birds and animals in accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 5207
must obtain from the Commissioner a license to do so; unless the species is listed as a domestic bird or animal, domestic pet, or unrestricted wild animal.

Permit Application.

Applications for a permit for importation and possession, scientific and educational collection, commercial collection, temporary exhibition, or propagation must be complete and submitted to the Department on an application form to be provided by the
Department. For an application to be complete, it must be legible, must contain all of the information requested by the Department, shall contain no false statements, must bear the applicant’s official signature, and must be accompanied
by the required application fee.

Facilities.

Any person permitted to import, possess, or collect wild animals shall provide adequate facilities as required by the Commissioner. Conditions may be imposed that require specific conditions for captivity or exposure to humans (e.g., prohibit the touching
of wild animals by any person other than the permit holder).

Inspections.

Persons holding a permit for dealer, importation and possession, scientific and educational collection, commercial collection, or temporary exhibition shall allow inspection at reasonable times of their premises, facilities, records and wild animals by
a State Game Warden, or other Department representative.

If upon inspection, a wild animal is not being kept as required by the conditions of the permit, or the presence of disease has been determined, destruction of the wild animal may be required by the Commissioner.

Violations.

Any wild animal that is taken, imported or possessed in violation of this regulation, or is kept in violation of any permit issued may be confiscated and disposed of in accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4513
. Permit violations and violations of Part 4 of Title 10 may result in the revocation of the permit.

HISTORY:
Added 2008, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 881, eff. Jan. 23, 2008.